Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1355
Pattern of racketeering activity
or collection of an unlawful debt; prohibited acts.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person
who has received any proceeds that such person knew were derived, directly
or indirectly, from a pattern of racketeering activity or through collection
of an unlawful debt to use or invest, whether directly or indirectly, any
part of such proceeds, or the proceeds derived from the investment or use
thereof, in the acquisition of any right, interest, or equity in real property
or in the establishment or operation of any enterprise. A purchase of securities
on the open market for purposes of investment, and without the intention of
controlling or participating in the control of the issuer or of assisting
another to do so, shall not be unlawful under this subsection if the securities
of the issuer held by the purchaser, the members of his or her immediate family,
and his or her or their accomplices in any pattern of racketeering activity
or the collection of an unlawful debt after such purchase do not amount in
the aggregate to one percent of the outstanding securities of any one class
and do not confer, either in law or in fact, the power to elect one or more
directors of the issuer.

(2) It shall
be unlawful for any person through a pattern of racketeering activity or through
collection of an unlawful debt to acquire or maintain, directly or indirectly,
any interest in or control of any enterprise or real property.

(3) It shall be unlawful
for any person employed by or associated with any enterprise to conduct or
participate in, directly or indirectly, the conduct of such enterprise's affairs
through a pattern of racketeering activity or collection of unlawful debt.

(4) It shall
be unlawful for any person to conspire or attempt to violate any of the provisions
of subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section.

Laws 2009, LB155, § 5.